Washington statutes.
RCW 11.86.041

Disposition of disclaimed interest.

(1) Unless the instrument creating an interest directs to the contrary, the interest disclaimed shall pass as if the beneficiary had died immediately prior to the date of the transfer of the interest. The disclaimer shall relate back to this date for all purposes.

(2) Unless the beneficiary provides otherwise in the disclaimer, in addition to the interests disclaimed, the beneficiary shall also be deemed to have disclaimed the minimum of all interests in the disclaimed property necessary to make the disclaimer a qualified disclaimer for purposes of section 2518 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Any future interest taking effect in possession or enjoyment after termination of the interest disclaimed takes effect as if the beneficiary had died prior to the date of the beneficiary's final ascertainment as a beneficiary and the indefeasible vesting of the interest.

(4) The disclaimer is binding upon the beneficiary and all persons claiming through or under the beneficiary.

(5) Unless the instrument creating the interest directs to the contrary, a beneficiary whose interest in a devise or bequest under a will has been disclaimed shall be deemed to have died for purposes of RCW 11.12.110.

(6) In the case of a disclaimer of property over which the disclaimant has any power to direct the beneficial enjoyment of the disclaimed property, the disclaimant shall also be deemed to have disclaimed any power to direct the beneficial enjoyment of the disclaimed property, unless the power is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the health, education, support, or maintenance of any person as described in section 2041 or 2514 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable regulations adopted under those sections. This subsection applies unless the disclaimer specifically provides otherwise. This subsection shall not be deemed to otherwise prevent such a disclaimant from acting as trustee or personal representative over disclaimed property.

[ 1999 c 43 s 1; 1997 c 252 s 73; 1991 c 7 s 1; 1989 c 34 s 4.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—1999 c 43: "This act applies retroactively to all disclaimers made after December 31, 1997." [ 1999 c 43 s 2.]

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.